Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1972YC (1) 91 as/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 710.12 Smuggling of persons. 1 1. A person commits the offense of smuggling of persons when 2 the person knowingly, for payment or some other benefit, does 3 any following involving a noncitizen individual: 4 a. Uses a motor vehicle, aircraft, watercraft, or other 5 means of conveyance to transport an individual with the intent 6 to: 7 (1) Conceal the individual from a peace officer. 8 (2) Flee from a person the actor knows is a peace officer 9 attempting to lawfully arrest or detain the actor. 10 b. Encourage or induce a person to enter or remain in 11 the United States in violation of federal law by concealing, 12 harboring, or shielding that person from detection. 13 c. Assist, guide, or direct two or more individuals to enter 14 or remain on agricultural land without the effective consent 15 of the owner. 16 2. An offense under this section is a class âCâ felony, 17 except that the offense is: 18 a. A class âBâ felony if the person or other party as 19 specified does any of the following: 20 (1) The person commits the offense in a manner that creates 21 a substantial likelihood that the smuggled individual will 22 suffer serious bodily injury or death. 23 (2) The person smuggles an individual who is a child younger 24 than eighteen years of age at the time of the offense. 25 (3) The person commits the offense with the intent to obtain 26 a pecuniary benefit. 27 (4) During the commission of the offense, the actor, another 28 party to the offense, or an individual assisted, guided, or 29 directed by the actor knowingly possessed a firearm. 30 b. A class âAâ felony under any of the following 31 circumstances: 32 (1) If as a direct result of the commission of the offense, 33 the smuggled individual became a victim of sexual abuse in the 34 first degree under section 709.2 or sexual abuse in the second 35 -1- LSB 1972YC (1) 91 as/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ degree under section 709.3. 1 (2) If the smuggled individual suffered serious bodily 2 injury or death. 3 3. It is an affirmative defense to prosecution of an offense 4 under this section, other than an offense punishable under 5 subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (1), or subsection 6 2, paragraph âbâ , that the actor is related to the smuggled 7 individual within the second degree of consanguinity or, at the 8 time of the offense, within the second degree of affinity. 9